Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-327.12
Statute of limitations; tolled;
section, how construed; violations; how treated.

(1) In the event that any portion of section
28-327 is enjoined and subsequently upheld, the statute of limitations for
filing a civil suit under section 28-327 shall be tolled during the period
for which the injunction is pending and for two years thereafter.

(2) Nothing
in section 28-327 shall be construed as defining a standard of care for any
medical procedure other than an induced abortion.

(3) A violation of subdivision
(4), (5), or (6) of section 28-327 shall not provide grounds for any criminal
action or disciplinary action against or revocation of a license to practice
medicine and surgery pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act.

Laws 2010, LB594, § 11.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.